Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 576.738 is amended to read:
576.738. (1) If a seed dealer fails to pay a producer for agricultural seed  when payment is due
under a seed production contract or fails to pay a seed grower for grass seed when  payment is due
under a seed purchase contract, the producer or seed grower may notify the State  Department of
Agriculture.  Upon  notification by a producer or seed grower, the department shall determine
whether payment has been made when due.  If the department determines that the seed dealer has
not made a payment that is due under a seed production contract or seed  purchase contract, the
department shall notify the seed dealer in writing [ that the] of the following requirements:
(a) The seed  dealer [ has 30  days to ] must  pay the producer or seed grower all delinquent
amounts plus interest  on each delinquent amount . Interest shall be calculated  at the rate of one
percent above the bank prime loan interest rate set forth in the most recent  Federal Reserve
Statistical Release H.15  per month [ simple interest ] from the final payment date for that delinquent
amount.
(b) The payment required under paragraph (a) of this  subsection must occur within 30
days of the date that the department’s written notice was issued to the seed dealer.
(c) Within the 30-day period specified in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the seed dealer
must provide to the department a written  notice and supporting documentation verifying
that the seed dealer has made the payment required under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) A seed production contract  or seed purchase contract may not vary the terms of the remedy
provided by this section. [ A seed dealer may  appeal the notice ] Notice given by the department under
this section [ as provided in ] is subject to  ORS chapter 183. This section does not prevent a producer
or seed grower from filing a notice of lien against a seed dealer.
(3) If a seed dealer fails to  make payment [ as required by a notice given by the department under
this section ] within the  30-day period specified in subsection (1) of this section , the department
shall suspend any seed dealer license issued to the dealer  until the dealer demonstrates to the sat-
isfaction of the department that  the dealer is current on all payments due to all producers and seed
growers. An order suspending a license under this subsection is subject to ORS chapter 183. How-
ever, the department may not suspend a seed dealer license under  this section using the procedure
described in ORS 183.430 (2).
(4) A seed  dealer that fails to make payment on a seed production contract or seed purchase
contract as required by a notice given by the department under this section is considered  to have
Enrolled House Bill 4065 (HB 4065-A) Page 1
authorized the producer or seed grower to sell in a commercially reasonable manner any  seed from
the contract that is still in the possession of the producer or  seed grower. This subsection does not
prevent a seed dealer from giving consent to the producer or seed grower  by other means and does
not supersede the terms of a consent given by other means.
(5) The department may charge a  producer or seed grower a fee, not to exceed  $100 [ $50], for
determining whether payment has been made in accordance with the  terms of a seed production
contract or seed purchase contract. The department may charge  a producer or seed grower a fee,
not to exceed  $400 [ $200], for notifying a seed dealer in writing regarding the deadline  for payment
of delinquent amounts plus interest.
SECTION 2.  ORS 576.802 is amended to read:
576.802. (1) If a seed dealer fails to pay a producer for other seed when payment  is due under
a seed production contract or fails to pay a seed grower for other seed when  payment is due under
a seed purchase contract, the producer or seed grower  may notify the State Department of Agri-
culture. Upon notification by a producer or seed grower, the department  shall determine whether
payment has been made when  due. If the department determines that the seed dealer has not made
a payment that is due under a seed production contract  or seed purchase contract, the department
shall notify the seed dealer in writing [ that the] of the following requirements:
(a) The seed  dealer [ has 30  days to ] must  pay the producer or seed grower all delinquent
amounts plus interest  on each delinquent amount . Interest shall be calculated  at the rate of one
percent above the bank prime loan interest rate set forth in the most recent  Federal Reserve
Statistical Release H.15  per month [ simple interest ] from the final payment date for that delinquent
amount.
(b) The payment required under paragraph (a) of this  subsection must occur within 30
days of the date that the department’s written notice was issued to the seed dealer.
(c) Within the 30-day period specified in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the seed dealer
must provide to the department a written  notice and supporting documentation verifying
that the seed dealer has made the payment required under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) A seed production contract  or seed purchase contract may not vary the terms of the remedy
provided by this section. [ A seed dealer may  appeal the notice ] Notice given by the department under
this section [ as provided in ] is subject to  ORS chapter 183. This section does not prevent a producer
or seed grower from filing a notice of lien against a seed dealer.
(3) If a seed dealer fails to  make payment [ as required by a notice given by the department under
this section ] within the  30-day period specified in subsection (1) of this section , the department
shall suspend any seed dealer license issued to the dealer  until the dealer demonstrates to the sat-
isfaction of the department that  the dealer is current on all payments due to all producers and seed
growers. An order suspending a license under this subsection is subject to ORS chapter 183. How-
ever, the department may not suspend a seed dealer license under  this section using the procedure
described in ORS 183.430 (2).
(4) A seed  dealer that fails to make payment on a seed production contract or seed purchase
contract as required by a notice given by the department under this section is considered  to have
authorized the producer or seed grower to sell in a commercially reasonable manner any  seed from
the contract that is still in the possession of the producer or  seed grower. This subsection does not
prevent a seed dealer from giving consent to the producer or seed grower  by other means and does
not supersede the terms of a consent given by other means.
(5) The department may charge a producer  or seed grower a fee, not to exceed  $100 [ $200], for
determining whether payment has been made in accordance with the  terms of a seed production
contract or seed purchase contract. The department may charge  a producer or seed grower a fee,
not to exceed  $400 [ $50], for notifying a seed dealer in writing regarding the deadline for payment
of delinquent amounts plus interest.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4065 (HB 4065-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4065 (HB 4065-A) Page 3